Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-816
Violations; declaratory judgment.

Any city, village, or county, through its chief law enforcement officer in which a person, firm or corporation violates or is about to violate sections 28-807 to 28-829 or has in his or its possession with intent to so violate, or is about to acquire possession with intent to so violate, any work, material, conduct or live performance which is obscene or an instrument of obscene use, or purports to be for such use or purpose, may maintain an action in the district court against such person, firm or corporation for a declaratory judgment under the Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act for the purpose of obtaining a judicial determination as to whether or not such work, material, conduct or live performance is obscene.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 172.

Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act, see section 25-21,164.